Nebraska, session 109, LB527.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Sections 1 to 8 of this act shall be known and may be cited as
the Medicaid Access and Quality Act.
Sec. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that:
(1) Wide discrepancies between medicaid reimbursement rates and rates of
other payers have created challenges to health care access for Nebraska
residents covered by medicaid;
(2) Approximately one-third of pregnant women, newborns, and children are
covered by medicaid and access to health care services is critical for them.
Access to labor and delivery services is critical to fostering healthy mothers
and babies;
(3) Access to primary care is vital to the health of Nebraska communities.
Investment in preventative care will help reduce future health care costs to
the state and its residents. Improved health outcomes are more likely when
patients have access to, and positive relationships with, their primary care
provider;
(4) Health care access challenges in rural areas have reached a critical
point, which requires bold investment and leadership from the state to maintain
the health of our rural citizens and communities; and
(5) Investment in physical health care access and quality in the medicaid
program is an investment in bolstering Nebraska's health care landscape as a
whole, addressing health care deserts across the state, and improving the
health and prosperity of Nebraska communities.
Sec. 3. For purposes of the Medicaid Access and Quality Act:
(1) Nonhospital provider means a provider of physical health services that
does not hold a license as a hospital under the Health Care Facility Licensure
Act;
(2) Physical health services means services billed under the medicaid
practitioner fee schedule to meet the physical health needs of a patient; and
(3) Rural means any county in Nebraska having a population of less than
one hundred thousand residents.
Sec. 4. (1) No later than January 1, 2026, the Director of Insurance
shall establish a schedule for the collection of a tax of six percent of the
gross amount of non-medicare direct writing premiums written under a health
maintenance organization certificate of authority pursuant to section
44-32,115, to the extent not preempted by federal law, during the current year
for business done in the state. The director shall remit the tax paid under
this section to the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall annually credit
the entirety of the tax remitted to the Medicaid Access and Quality Fund.
(2) No later than August 1, 2025, the Department of Health and Human
Services shall amend the medicaid state plan or file other federal authorizing
documents necessary to receive federal financial participation for the Medicaid
Access and Quality Act.
(3) The tax established by this section shall be effective January 1,
2026, and applies to premiums received during the current calendar year and
each year thereafter.
Sec. 5. The Medicaid Access and Quality Fund is created. Interest earned
on the fund shall be credited to the fund. Any money in the fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 6. (1) The Department of Health and Human Services shall use the
Medicaid Access and Quality Fund for the following purposes:
(a) Beginning January 1, 2026, forty million dollars annually shall be
used to obtain federal financial participation for the purpose of enhancing
rates paid to nonhospital providers of physical health services, as published
in the medicaid practitioner fee schedule. This funding shall not be used to
replace or offset existing state funds paid to providers for providing services
under the medical assistance program. In calculating a rate enhancement under
this subdivision, the department shall work with a statewide association exempt
from taxation under section 501(c)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 that
primarily represents health care providers in multiple specialties who are
licensed to practice medicine and surgery under the Uniform Credentialing Act.
It is the intent of the Legislature that a rate enhancement provided by this
subdivision should aim to improve access to care through increasing rates
across a broad range of physical health services provided by nonhospital
providers, with an emphasis on evaluation and management services, labor and
-1-

LB527 LB527
2025 2025
delivery services, and rural services;
(b) Beginning no later than January 1, 2027, five million dollars annually
shall be used to obtain federal financial participation to pay a monthly per-
member fee of not less than seventy-five dollars to qualified primary care
providers who meet criteria established by the Department of Health and Human
Services to serve as a primary care medical home for target populations; and
(c) Any remaining funds shall be transferred to the medical assistance
program and the Children's Health Insurance Program.
(2) Use of the funds described in this section is subject to all required
federal approvals including any approvals necessary for use of such funds to
obtain federal financial participation.
Sec. 7. It is the intent of the Legislature that the medicaid
practitioner fee schedule rates and the General Fund appropriations for rates
established in the fee schedule shall not be reduced in amounts lower than the
rates published as of July 1, 2024.
Sec. 8. The Department of Health and Human Services may adopt and
promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement the Medicaid Access and
Quality Act.
Sec. 9. Section 44-32,180, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
44-32,180 (1) Any health maintenance organization subject to the Health
Maintenance Organization Act shall also be subject to (a) the premium taxation
provisions of Chapter 77, article 9, to the extent that the direct writing
premiums are not otherwise subject to taxation under such article, and (b) the
retaliatory taxation provisions of section 44-150, and (c) the tax levied by
section 4 of this act.
(2) Any capitation payment made in accordance with the Medical Assistance
Act shall be excluded from computation of any tax obligation imposed by
subsection (1) of this section.
Sec. 10. Section 44-4726, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
44-4726 (1) The same taxes provided for in section 44-32,180 shall be
imposed upon each prepaid limited health service organization, and such
organizations also shall be entitled to the same tax deductions, reductions,
abatements, and credits that health maintenance organizations are entitled to
receive.
(2) Any capitation payment made in accordance with the Medical Assistance
Act shall be excluded from computation of any tax obligation imposed by
subsection (1) of this section.
Sec. 11. Section 77-908, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
77-908 (1) Every insurance company organized under the stock, mutual,
assessment, or reciprocal plan, except fraternal benefit societies, which is
transacting business in this state shall, on or before March 1 of each year,
pay a tax to the director of one percent of the gross amount of direct writing
premiums received by it during the preceding calendar year for business done in
this state, except that (a) (1) for group sickness and accident insurance the
rate of such tax shall be five-tenths of one percent, (b) and (2) for property
and casualty insurance, excluding individual sickness and accident insurance,
the rate of such tax shall be one percent, and (c) for health maintenance
organizations subject to the Health Maintenance Organization Act, the tax
levied by section 4 of this act shall be in addition to the tax paid under this
section.
(2) A captive insurer authorized under the Captive Insurers Act that is
transacting business in this state shall, on or before March 1 of each year,
pay to the director a tax of one-fourth of one percent of the gross amount of
direct writing premiums received by such insurer during the preceding calendar
year for business transacted in the state.
(3) The taxable premiums shall include premiums paid on the lives of
persons residing in this state and premiums paid for risks located in this
state whether the insurance was written in this state or not, including that
portion of a group premium paid which represents the premium for insurance on
Nebraska residents or risks located in Nebraska included within the group when
the number of lives in the group exceeds five hundred. The tax shall also apply
to premiums received by domestic companies for insurance written on individuals
residing outside this state or risks located outside this state if no
comparable tax is paid by the direct writing domestic company to any other
appropriate taxing authority. Companies whose scheme of operation contemplates
the return of a portion of premiums to policyholders, without such
policyholders being claimants under the terms of their policies, may deduct
such return premiums or dividends from their gross premiums for the purpose of
tax calculations. Any such insurance company shall receive a credit on the tax
imposed, except the tax paid under subdivision (1)(c) of this section, as
provided in the Creating High Impact Economic Futures Act, the Nebraska Job
Creation and Mainstreet Revitalization Act, the New Markets Job Growth
Investment Act, the Nebraska Higher Blend Tax Credit Act, the Relocation
Incentive Act, the Sustainable Aviation Fuel Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska
Shortline Rail Modernization Act, and the Affordable Housing Tax Credit Act.
Sec. 12. Original sections 44-32,180 and 44-4726, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, and section 77-908, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 13. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-2-